Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-427.02
Remote dispensing, defined.

Remote dispensing means dispensing that occurs using remote supervision in compliance with section 71-436.02.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 95.
July 19, 2018